North Carolina statutes. Chapter 80. Trademarks, Brands, etc.
ARTICLE 2.
Timber Marks.

§ 80-15. Timber dealers may adopt.

Any person dealing in timber in any form shall be known as a timber dealer and as such may adopt a trademark, in the manner and with the effect in this Article provided.

(1903, c. 261, s. 1; Rev., s. 3023; C.S., s. 3985.)

§ 80-16. How adopted, registered and published.

Every such dealer desiring to adopt a trademark may do so pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 80 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this section invalidates or otherwise alters the legal effect of any timber mark registered according to the law in effect at the time of registration.

(1889, c. 142; 1903, c. 261, s. 2; Rev., s. 3024; C.S., s. 3986; 1999, c. 456, s. 59; 2012-18, s. 1.11.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.11, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote the section.

§ 80-17. Property in and use of trademarks.

Every trademark so adopted shall, from the date thereof, be the exclusive property of the person adopting the same. The proprietor of such trademark shall, in using the same, cause it to be plainly stamped, branded or otherwise impressed upon each piece of timber upon which the same is placed.

(1889, c. 142; 1903, c. 261, ss. 3, 4; Rev., s. 3025; C.S., s. 3987.)

§ 80-18. Effect of branding timber purchased.

When timber is purchased by the proprietor of any such trademark, and the said trademark is placed thereon as hereinbefore provided, such timber shall thenceforth be deemed the property of such purchaser, without any other or further delivery thereof, and such timber shall thereafter be at the risk of the purchaser, unless otherwise provided by contract in writing between the parties.

(1889, c. 142; 1903, c. 261, s. 6; Rev., s. 3026; C.S., s. 3988.)

§ 80-19. Trademark on timber evidence of ownership.

In any action, suit or contest in which the title to any timber, upon which any trademark has been placed as aforesaid, shall come in question, it shall be presumed that such timber was the property of the proprietor of such trademark, in the absence of satisfactory proof to the contrary.

(1903, c. 261, s. 7; Rev., s. 3027; C.S., s. 3989.)

§ 80-20. Fraudulent use of timber trademark, misdemeanor.

If any person shall use or attempt to use any timber trademark without the written consent of the proprietor thereof, or falsely and fraudulently place any trademark on timber not the property of the owner of such trademark without his written consent, or intentionally and without lawful authority remove, deface or destroy any timber trademark or the imprint thereof on any timber or intentionally put any such timber in such a position or place so remote from the stream from which it was taken or on which it was afloat as to render it inconvenient or unnecessarily expensive to replace the same in such stream, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

(1903, c. 261, ss. 3-5; Rev., s. 3854; C.S., s. 3990; 1993, c. 539, s. 584; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).)

§ 80-21. Larceny of branded timber.

If any person shall knowingly and unlawfully buy, sell, take and carry away, secrete, destroy or convert to his own use, any timber upon which a trademark is stamped, branded or otherwise impressed, or shall knowingly and unlawfully buy, sell, take and carry away, secrete, destroy or convert to his own use, any timber upon which a trademark has been intentionally and without lawful authority removed, defaced or destroyed, he shall be deemed guilty of larceny thereof and punished as in other cases of larceny.

(1903, c. 261, s. 5; Rev., s. 3853; C.S., s. 3991.)

§ 80-22. Altering timber trademark crime.

If any person shall willfully change, alter, erase or destroy any registered timber mark or brand put or cut upon any logs, timber, lumber or boards, except by the consent of the owner thereof, with intent to steal the said logs or timber, he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

(1889, c. 142, s. 3; 1903, c. 41; Rev., s. 3855; C.S., s. 3992; 1943, c. 543; 1993, c. 539, s. 585; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).)

§ 80-23. Possession of branded logs without consent, misdemeanor.

If any person shall knowingly and willfully take up or have in his possession any log, timber, lumber or board upon which a registered timber mark or brand has been put or cut, except by the consent of the owner thereof, he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

(1889, c. 142, s. 4; 1903, c. 42; Rev., s. 3856; C.S., s. 3993; 1993, c. 539, s. 586; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).)